Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4051
Licensure; exceptions.

(1) Nothing in the Insurance Producers Licensing Act shall be construed to require an insurer to obtain an insurance producer license. For purposes of this section, the term insurer does not include an insurer's officers, directors, employees, subsidiaries, or affiliates.

(2) The following persons need not be licensed as an insurance producer:

(a) An officer, director, or employee of an insurer or of an insurance producer if the officer, director, or employee does not receive any commission on policies written or sold to insure risks residing, located, or to be performed in this state and:

(i) The officer's, director's, or employee's activities are executive, administrative, managerial, clerical, or a combination of these, and are only indirectly related to the sale, solicitation, or negotiation of insurance;

(ii) The officer's, director's, or employee's function relates to underwriting, loss control, inspection, or the processing, adjusting, investigating, or settling of a claim on a contract of insurance; or

(iii) The officer, director, or employee is acting in the capacity of a special agent or agency supervisor assisting insurance producers when the person's activities are limited to providing technical advice and assistance to licensed insurance producers and do not include the sale, solicitation, or negotiation of insurance;

(b) A person who secures and furnishes information for the purpose of group life insurance, group property and casualty insurance, group annuities, or group or blanket health insurance or for the purpose of enrolling individuals under insurance plans or issuing certificates thereunder, or otherwise assisting in administering such insurance plans, when no commission is paid for such service;

(c) An employer or his, her, or its officers, directors, or employees or the trustee of any employee trust plan to the extent that such employer, officer, director, employee, or trustee is engaged in the administration or operation of any program of employee benefits for his, her, or its own employees or the employees of a subsidiary or affiliate involving the use of insurance issued by a licensed insurer if such employer, officer, director, employee, or trustee is not in any manner compensated directly or indirectly by the insurer issuing such insurance;

(d) Employees of insurers or organizations employed by insurers who are engaging in the inspection, rating, or classification of risks or in the supervision of the training of insurance producers and who are not individually engaged in the sale, solicitation, or negotiation of insurance;

(e) A person whose activities in this state are limited to advertising without the intent to solicit insurance in this state through communications in printed publications or other forms of electronic mass media whose distribution is not limited to residents of the state if the person does not sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance that would insure risks residing, located, or to be performed in this state;

(f) A person who is not a resident of this state who sells, solicits, or negotiates a contract of insurance for commercial property and casualty risks to an insured with risks located in more than one state insured under that contract if that person is otherwise licensed as an insurance producer to sell, solicit, or negotiate that insurance in the state where the insured maintains its principal place of business and the contract of insurance insures risks located in that state; or

(g) A salaried full-time employee who counsels or advises his or her employer relative to the insurance interests of the employer or of the subsidiaries or business affiliates of the employer if the employee does not sell or solicit insurance or receive a commission.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 5.